Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1005
Administrative costs; limitation; rules and regulations.

Administrative costs for the administration of the Trail Development Assistance Fund shall not exceed five percent of the appropriation authorized by the Legislature. The Game and Parks Commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Trail Development Assistance Act.

Laws 1991, LB 714, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1505;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 380.
January 1, 2010